dictionaries/be_BY/be-official.aff
# Belarusian Spellchecker Dictionary for official orthography 2008
#
# Dictionary based on Belarusian Grammar Database (https://bnkorpus.info/grammar.html)
# by Aleś Bułojčyk <alex73mail@gmail.com> and Uładzimir Koščanka <koshul@gmail.com>
#
# License:  CC BY-SA 4.0
#
SET UTF-8
TRY йцукенгшўзх'фывапролджэячсмітьбюёЁЙЦУКЕНГШЎЗХФЫВАПРОЛДЖЭЯЧСМІТЬБЮ
WORDCHARS '
FLAG num
SFX 3608 Y 1
SFX 3608 0 анеш .
SFX 607 Y 1
SFX 607 0 шым .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 вічы .
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 ва .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 ве .
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 0 альнымі .
SFX 4010 Y 1
SFX 4010 0 цыйнымі .
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 0 аграфічнага .
SFX 1504 Y 1
SFX 1504 0 вальную .
SFX 1030 Y 1
SFX 1030 0 лівым .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 альных .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 альныя .
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 0 едам .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 авых .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 авыя .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 0 ьную .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 алогію .
SFX 2089 Y 1
SFX 2089 0 алогія .
SFX 2091 Y 1
SFX 2091 0 алогіі .
SFX 3495 Y 1
SFX 3495 0 аўшчынай .
SFX 4739 Y 1
SFX 4739 0 піць .
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 0 льскі .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 даюць .
SFX 3741 Y 1
SFX 3741 0 шыць .
SFX 4494 Y 1
SFX 4494 0 алам .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 0 чана .
SFX 1691 Y 1
SFX 1691 0 нічаем .
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 0 аваных .
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 0 аваныя .
SFX 4720 Y 1
SFX 4720 0 хваючы .
SFX 1421 Y 1
SFX 1421 0 лівасць .
SFX 1420 Y 1
SFX 1420 0 лівасцю .
SFX 1422 Y 1
SFX 1422 0 лівасці .
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 0 шанага .
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 0 шчыкамі .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 оваму .
SFX 1842 Y 1
SFX 1842 0 руючы .
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 0 графічнае .
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 0 графічнай .
SFX 4778 Y 1
SFX 4778 0 лівайцеся .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 рскім .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 анага .
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 0 енаю .
SFX 1092 Y 1
SFX 1092 0 еная .
SFX 4234 Y 1
SFX 4234 0 паеце .
SFX 4318 Y 1
SFX 4318 0 шкай .
SFX 1739 Y 1
SFX 1739 0 шкам .
SFX 3772 Y 1
SFX 3772 0 сьці .
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 0 бяць .
SFX 4033 Y 1
SFX 4033 0 тцы .
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 0 ака .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 залі .
SFX 3144 Y 1
SFX 3144 0 графію .
SFX 3143 Y 1
SFX 3143 0 графія .
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 0 графіі .
SFX 4463 Y 1
SFX 4463 0 годдзям .
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 0 яце .
SFX 1812 Y 1
SFX 1812 0 чанае .
SFX 1810 Y 1
SFX 1810 0 чанай .
SFX 3510 Y 1
SFX 3510 0 аграфію .
SFX 3509 Y 1
SFX 3509 0 аграфія .
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 0 аграфіі .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 ымі .
SFX 4473 Y 1
SFX 4473 0 бай .
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 0 бам .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 нага .
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 0 куюць .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 0 заванаму .
SFX 4847 Y 1
SFX 4847 0 галовым .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 жана .
SFX 4974 Y 1
SFX 4974 0 навалі .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 шкамі .
SFX 1952 Y 1
SFX 1952 0 ляемся .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 ецеся .
SFX 3806 Y 1
SFX 3806 0 арскімі .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 анню .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 ання .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 анні .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 лося .
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 0 ка .
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 0 іўшы .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 0 р .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 с .
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 0 т .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 у .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 х .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 ц .
SFX 1283 Y 1
SFX 1283 0 ч .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 ш .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 ы .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 ь .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 ю .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 я .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 і .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 ў .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 нула .
SFX 1166 Y 1
SFX 1166 0 аўскаю .
SFX 1151 Y 1
SFX 1151 0 аўская .
SFX 3189 Y 1
SFX 3189 0 оўвалі .
SFX 712 Y 1
SFX 712 0 шую .
SFX 3306 Y 1
SFX 3306 0 ствуюць .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 вальных .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 вальныя .
SFX 2058 Y 1
SFX 2058 0 ьваліся .
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 0 альнае .
SFX 866 Y 1
SFX 866 0 альнай .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 аваўся .
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 0 оўшчыцах .
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 0 оўшчыцаю .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 зацыю .
SFX 1897 Y 1
SFX 1897 0 зацыя .
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 0 зацыі .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 ках .
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 каю .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 кая .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 каў .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 авае .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 0 авай .
SFX 3615 Y 1
SFX 3615 0 авак .
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 0 авам .
SFX 1032 Y 1
SFX 1032 0 лівую .
SFX 4355 Y 1
SFX 4355 0 таваны .
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 0 шчыцкаму .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 ьных .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 ьныя .
SFX 4760 Y 1
SFX 4760 0 няюць .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 0 іравалі .
SFX 1187 Y 1
SFX 1187 0 ўкай .
SFX 2453 Y 1
SFX 2453 0 ўкам .
SFX 3652 Y 1
SFX 3652 0 ствамі .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 0 овачным .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 ьвала .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 наваю .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 навая .
SFX 4973 Y 1
SFX 4973 0 наваў .
SFX 4892 Y 1
SFX 4892 0 ьству .
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 0 ьвайцеся .
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 0 сцкім .
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 0 шымі .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 лісты .
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 аванае .
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 0 аванай .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 кнуць .
SFX 3508 Y 1
SFX 3508 0 аграфіяй .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 овага .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 чаюць .
SFX 4527 Y 1
SFX 4527 0 чаеш .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 кавым .
SFX 4082 Y 1
SFX 4082 0 ісе .
SFX 3939 Y 1
SFX 3939 0 будаванню .
SFX 3938 Y 1
SFX 3938 0 будавання .
SFX 3940 Y 1
SFX 3940 0 будаванні .
SFX 4993 Y 1
SFX 4993 0 льскае .
SFX 4992 Y 1
SFX 4992 0 льскай .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 цца .
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 0 льшчыцамі .
SFX 4353 Y 1
SFX 4353 0 таванымі .
SFX 1893 Y 1
SFX 1893 0 ізм .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 0 раваць .
SFX 3534 Y 1
SFX 3534 0 чней .
SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 0 свае .
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 0 свай .
SFX 4851 Y 1
SFX 4851 0 галоваму .
SFX 3604 Y 1
SFX 3604 0 анула .
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 0 ліваўся .
SFX 4663 Y 1
SFX 4663 0 будаўнікам .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 аву .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 авы .
SFX 2340 Y 1
SFX 2340 0 нутаю .
SFX 2339 Y 1
SFX 2339 0 нутая .
SFX 3133 Y 1
SFX 3133 0 ерны .
SFX 3972 Y 1
SFX 3972 0 ыха .
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 0 ыкай .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 ыкам .
SFX 3378 Y 1
SFX 3378 0 зяце .
SFX 1267 Y 1
SFX 1267 0 калі .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 0 заванага .
SFX 4068 Y 1
SFX 4068 0 нала .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 аўкай .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 аўкам .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 енаму .
SFX 4789 Y 1
SFX 4789 0 йку .
SFX 4790 Y 1
SFX 4790 0 йкі .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 ачны .
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 0 анце .
SFX 4076 Y 1
SFX 4076 0 ленасць .
SFX 4075 Y 1
SFX 4075 0 ленасцю .
SFX 4077 Y 1
SFX 4077 0 ленасці .
SFX 4848 Y 1
SFX 4848 0 галовую .
SFX 4818 Y 1
SFX 4818 0 жаеш .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 ітам .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 віце .
SFX 2244 Y 1
SFX 2244 0 чвалі .
SFX 3826 Y 1
SFX 3826 0 ьвайся .
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 0 шых .
SFX 3827 Y 1
SFX 3827 0 шыш .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 шыя .
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 0 шыў .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 авікам .
SFX 1508 Y 1
SFX 1508 0 вальнае .
SFX 1507 Y 1
SFX 1507 0 вальнай .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 ву .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 зуючы .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 вы .
SFX 4471 Y 1
SFX 4471 0 ві .
SFX 3205 Y 1
SFX 3205 0 навымі .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 ніцай .
SFX 772 Y 1
SFX 772 0 ніцам .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 яецца .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 0 шчыцкага .
SFX 1028 Y 1
SFX 1028 0 лівых .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 лівыя .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 ьнае .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 ьнай .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 саць .
SFX 1587 Y 1
SFX 1587 0 кайце .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 канне .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 ізаваў .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 дзіла .
SFX 4453 Y 1
SFX 4453 0 едах .
SFX 4454 Y 1
SFX 4454 0 едаў .
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 0 аўшчынаю .
SFX 1416 Y 1
SFX 1416 0 ннымі .
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 0 сваем .
SFX 2834 Y 1
SFX 2834 0 овачную .
SFX 4272 Y 1
SFX 4272 0 зне .
SFX 4348 Y 1
SFX 4348 0 хаецца .
SFX 4492 Y 1
SFX 4492 0 алах .
SFX 4672 Y 1
SFX 4672 0 алаў .
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 0 люць .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 чаны .
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 0 нічаеш .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 стасць .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 стасцю .
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 0 стасці .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 кавую .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 0 графічнаю .
SFX 3591 Y 1
SFX 3591 0 графічная .
SFX 4854 Y 1
SFX 4854 0 галовага .
SFX 1874 Y 1
SFX 1874 0 раванымі .
SFX 2395 Y 1
SFX 2395 0 рскіх .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 рскія .
SFX 1339 Y 1
SFX 1339 0 ліваюць .
SFX 1738 Y 1
SFX 1738 0 шках .
SFX 4504 Y 1
SFX 4504 0 шкаю .
SFX 2317 Y 1
SFX 2317 0 шкаў .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 вальнаму .
SFX 2668 Y 1
SFX 2668 0 аку .
SFX 3398 Y 1
SFX 3398 0 акі .
SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 0 ажнымі .
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 0 атычнаму .
SFX 4460 Y 1
SFX 4460 0 годдзях .
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 0 годдзяў .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 ыла .
SFX 4488 Y 1
SFX 4488 0 атычнага .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 яць .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 енага .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 нка .
SFX 1805 Y 1
SFX 1805 0 чанаю .
SFX 1803 Y 1
SFX 1803 0 чаная .
SFX 1279 Y 1
SFX 1279 0 чка .
SFX 3438 Y 1
SFX 3438 0 нскую .
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 0 раеце .
SFX 3945 Y 1
SFX 3945 0 бах .
SFX 4668 Y 1
SFX 4668 0 баю .
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 0 баў .
SFX 4845 Y 1
SFX 4845 0 галовых .
SFX 4844 Y 1
SFX 4844 0 галовыя .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 жаны .
SFX 982 Y 1
SFX 982 0 шчыцай .
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 0 шчыцам .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 0 істка .
SFX 3359 Y 1
SFX 3359 0 ісцкую .
SFX 3999 Y 1
SFX 3999 0 шваеце .
SFX 497 Y 1
SFX 497 0 ычнаму .
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 0 чваючы .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 шае .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 шай .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 0 шак .
SFX 2588 Y 1
SFX 2588 0 шам .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 ленне .
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 0 чыцай .
SFX 1593 Y 1
SFX 1593 0 чыцам .
SFX 2736 Y 1
SFX 2736 0 вод .
SFX 1145 Y 1
SFX 1145 0 вое .
SFX 4290 Y 1
SFX 4290 0 воз .
SFX 1084 Y 1
SFX 1084 0 вой .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 ку .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 кі .
SFX 3616 Y 1
SFX 3616 0 яўся .
SFX 2571 Y 1
SFX 2571 0 льшчык .
SFX 668 Y 1
SFX 668 0 нулі .
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 0 оўшчыцамі .
SFX 1767 Y 1
SFX 1767 0 ніцкаму .
SFX 637 Y 1
SFX 637 0 лівае .
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 0 лівай .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 рскі .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 0 ыўнаму .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 альнаю .
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 0 альная .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 самі .
SFX 4141 Y 1
SFX 4141 0 вальшчыкам .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 падобнымі .
SFX 4664 Y 1
SFX 4664 0 будаўніка .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 аваю .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 авая .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 аваў .
SFX 2451 Y 1
SFX 2451 0 ўках .
SFX 1186 Y 1
SFX 1186 0 ўкаю .
SFX 3986 Y 1
SFX 3986 0 шыла .
SFX 2830 Y 1
SFX 2830 0 овачных .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 0 овачныя .
SFX 1907 Y 1
SFX 1907 0 ьвалі .
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 0 ючымі .
SFX 2367 Y 1
SFX 2367 0 жваць .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 ьваешся .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 ўшыся .
SFX 2982 Y 1
SFX 2982 0 чаце .
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 0 авальнаму .
SFX 3213 Y 1
SFX 3213 0 лагічны .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 ліне .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 нкай .
SFX 1056 Y 1
SFX 1056 0 нкам .
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 0 сцкіх .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 сцкія .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 0 зеш .
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 0 ылася .
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 0 аванаю .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 аваная .
SFX 3507 Y 1
SFX 3507 0 аграфіяю .
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 0 цім .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 0 кавых .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 0 кавыя .
SFX 3296 Y 1
SFX 3296 0 тарамі .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 0 іст .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 іся .
SFX 1817 Y 1
SFX 1817 0 ціце .
SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 0 пайце .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 ваецца .
SFX 4990 Y 1
SFX 4990 0 льскаю .
SFX 4989 Y 1
SFX 4989 0 льская .
SFX 3049 Y 1
SFX 3049 0 жвацца .
SFX 1495 Y 1
SFX 1495 0 вальнага .
SFX 4566 Y 1
SFX 4566 0 сваю .
SFX 4568 Y 1
SFX 4568 0 сваў .
SFX 3056 Y 1
SFX 3056 0 віком .
SFX 3239 Y 1
SFX 3239 0 ацыйнаму .
SFX 3603 Y 1
SFX 3603 0 анулі .
SFX 4661 Y 1
SFX 4661 0 будаўніках .
SFX 3808 Y 1
SFX 3808 0 арскі .
SFX 3965 Y 1
SFX 3965 0 ыху .
SFX 3966 Y 1
SFX 3966 0 ыхі .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 ямі .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 ыках .
SFX 1273 Y 1
SFX 1273 0 ыкаю .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 ыкаў .
SFX 3102 Y 1
SFX 3102 0 онам .
SFX 3932 Y 1
SFX 3932 0 гаць .
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 0 зяць .
SFX 3587 Y 1
SFX 3587 0 графічнымі .
SFX 4858 Y 1
SFX 4858 0 водчым .
SFX 4400 Y 1
SFX 4400 0 налі .
SFX 4853 Y 1
SFX 4853 0 галовае .
SFX 4852 Y 1
SFX 4852 0 галовай .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 ляючыся .
SFX 4474 Y 1
SFX 4474 0 аўках .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 0 аўкаю .
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 0 ычнага .
SFX 3396 Y 1
SFX 3396 0 анцы .
